Maryland, session 2026, SB0489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
14–308.
(b) An applicant for a license is exempt from the educational requirements of §
14–307 of this subtitle, if the applicant:
(6) Meets one of the following requirements:
(i) The applicant graduated from any international medical school
and submits evidence acceptable to the Board of successful completion of 2 years of training
in a postgraduate medical education program accredited by [an] THE ACCREDITATION
COUNCIL FOR GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION–INTERNATIONAL (ACGME–I) OR
ANOTHER accrediting organization recognized by the Board; or
14–314.
(a) (1) [Except] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
EXCEPT as otherwise provided in this title, a license authorizes the licensee to practice
medicine while the license is effective.
(2) A LICENSEE WHO QUALIFIES UNDER § 14–308(B)(6)(I) OF THIS
SUBTITLE MAY PRACTICE MEDICINE DURING THE LICENSEE’S INITIAL LICENSE
TERM ONLY UNDER SUPERVISION, AS REQUIRED BY THE BOARD.
14–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) (1) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a license issued
by the Board to practice medicine or an allied health profession regulated by the Board.
(2) “LICENSE” INCLUDES, UNLESS THE CONTEXT REQUIRES
OTHERWISE, A LIMITED LICENSE ISSUED UNDER § 14–308 OF THIS TITLE.

SENATE BILL 489 3
[14–308.] 14–307.1.
[(a) (1) In this section the following terms have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Fifth pathway program” means a program that the Board approves in
its regulations for a student who:
(i) Has studied medicine at an international medical school;
(ii) Was a United States citizen when the student enrolled in the
international medical school; and
(iii) Has completed all of the formal requirements for graduation
from the international medical school, except for any social service or postgraduate
requirements.
(3) “International medical school” means a medical school located outside
of the United States, its territories or possessions, Puerto Rico, or Canada.
(b)] An applicant for a license is exempt from the educational requirements of §
14–307 of this subtitle, if the applicant:
(1) Has studied medicine at an international medical school;
(2) Is certified by the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical
Graduates or by its successor as approved by the Board;
(3) Passes a qualifying examination for international medical school
graduates required by the Board;
(4) Meets any other qualifications for international medical school
graduates that the Board establishes in its regulation for licensing of applicants;
(5) Submits acceptable evidence to the Board of the requirements set in the
Board’s regulations; and
(6) [Meets one of the following requirements:
(i) The applicant graduated] GRADUATED from any international
medical school and submits evidence acceptable to the Board of successful completion of 2
years of POSTGRADUATE training in [a postgraduate medical education program] AN
accredited TRAINING PROGRAM [by an accrediting organization recognized by the Board;
or

SENATE BILL 489
(ii) The applicant successfully completed a fifth pathway program
and submits evidence acceptable to the Board that the applicant:
1. Has a document issued by the international medical school
certifying that the applicant completed all of the formal requirements of that school for the
study of medicine, except for the postgraduate or social service components as required by
the international country or its medical school;
2. Has successfully completed a fifth pathway program; and
3. Has successfully completed 2 years of training in a
postgraduate medical education program following completion of a Board approved fifth
pathway program].
14–308.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “HEALTH CARE FACILITY” MEANS:
(1) A LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT;
(2) A SCHOOL OF MEDICINE;
(3) A FEDERALLY QUALIFIED HEALTH CENTER;
(4) A HEALTH SYSTEM;
(5) A HOSPITAL;
(6) A HOSPITAL–BASED FACILITY; OR
(7) A FREESTANDING EMERGENCY FACILITY.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PHYSICIAN WHO:
(1) HAS COMPLETED:
(I) A RESIDENCY ACCREDITED BY THE ACCREDITATION
COUNCIL FOR GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION;
(II) A RESIDENCY ACCREDITED BY THE AMERICAN
OSTEOPATHIC ASSOCIATION; OR
(III) ROYAL COLLEGE OF PHYSICIANS AND SURGEONS
ACCREDITED RESIDENCY TRAINING IN CANADA; OR

SENATE BILL 489 5
(2) PREVIOUSLY HELD A MEDICAL LICENSE ISSUED IN THE UNITED
STATES OR CANADA.
(C) BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2028, THE BOARD MAY ISSUE A LIMITED
LICENSE TO PRACTICE MEDICINE TO A PHYSICIAN TRAINED AND LICENSED IN A
FOREIGN COUNTRY WHO MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(D) TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A LIMITED LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION, AN
APPLICANT SHALL:
(1) BE OF GOOD MORAL CHARACTER;
(2) HAVE RECEIVED A DEGREE OF DOCTOR OF MEDICINE OR ITS
EQUIVALENT FROM A MEDICAL SCHOOL LOCATED OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES
WITH RECOGNIZED ACCREDITATION STATUS FROM THE EDUCATIONAL
COMMISSION FOR FOREIGN MEDICAL GRADUATES;
(3) HAVE COMPLETED AT LEAST 2 YEARS OF TRAINING IN A
RESIDENCY PROGRAM:
(I) ACCREDITED BY THE AMERICAN COUNCIL FOR GRADUATE
MEDICAL EDUCATION – INTERNATIONAL;
(II) IN A COUNTRY WHOSE GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION
ACCREDITING AGENCY HAS BEEN RECOGNIZED BY THE WORLD FEDERATION FOR
MEDICAL EDUCATION; OR
(III) ACCREDITED BY ANOTHER ACCREDITATION AUTHORITY
APPROVED BY THE BOARD;
(4) (I) HAVE BEEN IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE MEDICAL
LICENSING OR REGULATORY AUTHORITY IN THE FOREIGN COUNTRY AT THE TIME
OF THE APPLICANT’S DEPARTURE; OR
(II) IF REASONABLE ATTEMPTS TO OBTAIN THE INDIVIDUAL’S
LICENSURE STATUS HAVE BEEN UNSUCCESSFUL, BE APPROVED BY THE BOARD ON
AN INDIVIDUAL BASIS;
(5) HAVE NO PENDING DISCIPLINARY MATTERS BEFORE A LICENSING
OR REGULATORY BODY;
(6) HAVE AN OFFER OF EMPLOYMENT WITH A PARTICIPATING
HEALTH CARE FACILITY THAT WILL EVALUATE THE APPLICANT’S NONCLINICAL

SENATE BILL 489
SKILLS AND FAMILIARITY WITH STANDARDS APPROPRIATE FOR MEDICAL PRACTICE
IN THE STATE; AND
(7) SATISFY ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE
BOARD IN REGULATION, INCLUDING PRIOR PRACTICE EXPERIENCE.
(E) THE BOARD MAY DETERMINE AN APPLICANT INELIGIBLE FOR A
LIMITED LICENSE IF THE APPLICANT:
(1) WAS SUBJECT TO PREVIOUS DISCIPLINARY ACTION;
(2) HAD DISCIPLINE OR COMPETENCY PROBLEMS DURING THE
APPLICANT’S POSTGRADUATE TRAINING; OR
(3) FAILS TO SUBMIT EVIDENCE ACCEPTABLE TO THE BOARD THAT
THE APPLICANT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS FOR A LIMITED LICENSE.
(F) TO APPLY FOR A LIMITED LICENSE, AN APPLICANT SHALL:
(1) SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE BOARD ON THE FORM THAT THE
BOARD REQUIRES; AND
(2) PAY TO THE BOARD AN APPLICATION FEE SET BY THE BOARD.
(G) (1) THE TERM OF A LIMITED LICENSE MAY NOT EXCEED 3 YEARS.
(2) A LIMITED LICENSE MAY NOT BE RENEWED.
(H) A LIMITED LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO PRACTICE MEDICINE
ONLY:
(1) WHILE EMPLOYED IN FULL–TIME EMPLOYMENT BY THE HEALTH
CARE FACILITY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (D)(6) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) IN THE EMPLOYING HEALTH CARE FACILITY OR A HEALTH CARE
FACILITY OPERATED BY THE EMPLOYING HEALTH CARE FACILITY.
(I) THE BOARD MAY REVOKE A LIMITED LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS
SECTION IF:
(1) THE LICENSEE PRACTICES OUTSIDE THE SCOPE OF THE LIMITED
LICENSE;
(2) THE LICENSEE IS NO LONGER EMPLOYED BY THE HEALTH CARE
FACILITY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (D)(6) OF THIS SECTION;

SENATE BILL 489 7
(3) THE LICENSEE PRACTICES MEDICINE OUTSIDE THE STATE
WITHOUT BEING LEGALLY AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE MEDICINE IN THE OTHER
JURISDICTION;
(4) THE LICENSEE HAS BEEN SUBJECT TO A DISCIPLINARY ACTION BY
THE HEALTH CARE FACILITY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (D)(6) OF THIS SECTION OR
THE BOARD; OR
(5) THE LICENSEE IS NO LONGER ELIGIBLE FOR THE LIMITED
LICENSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the State Board of Physicians
shall consult with MedChi, the Maryland State Medical Society, on the development of
policies and regulations implementing this Act.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.